test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-24susi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - susi: # Noun (24) susi 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     susi+N+Sg+Nom: susi
     susi+N+Sg+Gen: soe
     susi+N+Sg+Par: sutt
     susi+N+Sg+Ill: suttõ
     susi+N+Sg+Ine: soen
     susi+N+Sg+Ela: soest
     susi+N+Sg+All: soelõ
     susi+N+Sg+Ade: soel
     susi+N+Sg+Abl: soelt
     susi+N+Sg+Tra: soes
     susi+N+Sg+Ter: soeniq
     susi+N+Sg+Abe: soeldaq
     susi+N+Sg+Com: soegaq
     susi+N+Pl+Nom: soeq
     susi+N+Pl+Gen: sussõ
     susi+N+Pl+Par: sussõ
     susi+N+Pl+Ill: sussõhe
     susi+N+Pl+Ine: susõn
     susi+N+Pl+Ela: susõst
     susi+N+Pl+All: susõlõ
     susi+N+Pl+Ade: susõl
     susi+N+Pl+Abl: susõlt
     susi+N+Pl+Tra: susõs
     susi+N+Pl+Ter: susõniq
     susi+N+Pl+Abe: susõldaq
     susi+N+Pl+Com: sussõgaq
